apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vbtr_ntr"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i__vbser"> <!-- pp = inta ĉar it-formoj ne ekzistas (same kiel en netransitivaj verboj) -->
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>               <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ontaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ante</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l>                <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igi</l>              <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igas</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igis</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igos</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igus</l>             <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintaj</l>   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintajn</l>  <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igintan</l>   <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igonta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igontaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igante</l>           <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginte</l>           <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igu</l>              <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igas</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>iginta</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="aperi">                          <i>aper</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="aspekti">                        <i>aspekt</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ekesti">                         <i>ekest</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ekzisti">                        <i>ekzist</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="esti">                           <i>est</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="esti akceptita">                 <i>est</i><par n="i__vbser"/><p><l><b/>akceptita</l><r><g><b/>akceptita</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="kunekzisti">                     <i>kunekzist</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="malesti">                        <i>malest</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="manki">                          <i>mank</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="mieni">                          <i>mien</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="necesi">                         <i>neces</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="povi esti">                      <i>pov</i><par n="i__vbser"/><p><l><b/>esti</l><r><g><b/>esti</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="reaperi">                        <i>reaper</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="resti">                          <i>rest</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="ŝajni">                          <i>ŝajn</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="sekvi">                          <i>sekv</i><par n="i__vbser"/></e>
